Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0214.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 9a. As used in sections 9b and 9c: (a) "Strategic advisory board" means the strategic advisory board created in section 9b. (b) "Strategic plan" means the strategic plan required under section 9c(1) and includes an updated strategic plan under section 9c(2). Sec. 9b. (1) The strategic advisory board is created in the fund. (2) The strategic advisory board must consist of the following members: (a) The following voting members: (i) The 4 members elected by the nonvoting members described in subdivision (b)(i) as described under subsection (7). (ii) The 4 members elected by the nonvoting members described in subdivision (b)(ii) as described under subsection (7). (iii) The 4 members elected by the nonvoting members described in subdivision (b)(iii) as described under subsection (7). (iv) The 4 members elected by the nonvoting members described in subdivision (b)(iv) as described under subsection (7). (v) The 4 members elected by the nonvoting members described in subdivision (b)(v) as described under subsection (7). (vi) The 4 members elected by the nonvoting members described in subdivision (b)(vi) as described under subsection (7). (vii) The 4 members elected by the nonvoting members described in subdivision (b)(vii) as described under subsection (7). (viii) The 4 members elected by the nonvoting members described in subdivision (b)(viii) as described under subsection (7). (b) The following, except as otherwise provided in this section, nonvoting members, appointed by the governor: (i) The following nonvoting members with expertise in jobs, talent acquisition, and small business: (A) One representative from Traverse Connect. (B) One representative from Business Leaders for Michigan. (C) One representative from the Detroit Chamber of Commerce. (D) One representative from the Upjohn Institute. (E) One representative from MichBusiness. (F) One representative from the department of labor and economic opportunity. (G) One representative from the Small Business Association of Michigan. (H) One representative from Michigan Works!. (ii) The following nonvoting members with expertise in transit: (A) One representative from Transportation Riders United. (B) One transit representative from the Southeast Michigan Council of Governments. (C) One representative from The Rapid. (D) One representative from the Capital Area Transit Authority. (E) One representative from SMART. (F) One representative from the Detroit department of transportation. (G) One representative from the state transportation department. (H) One representative from the Michigan Transportation Team Coalition. (I) One representative from the Michigan Public Transit Association. (J) One representative from the Regional Transit Authority. (iii) The following nonvoting members with expertise in economic and community development: (A) One representative from the Northeast Michigan Council of Governments. (B) One representative from Lakeshore Advantage. (C) One representative from The Right Place. (D) One representative from Saginaw Future. (E) One representative from Flint and Genesee Economic Alliance. (F) One representative from the Lansing Economic Area Partnership. (G) One representative from the Cornerstone Alliance. (H) One representative from Southwest Michigan First. (I) One representative from the Detroit Economic Growth Corporation. (J) One representative from the Detroit Regional Partnership. (K) One representative from the Michigan Economic Developers Association. (L) One representative from the Northern Lakes Economic Alliance. (M) One representative from the MEDC. (N) One representative from the office of global Michigan. (O) One representative from the Community Economic Development Association of Michigan. (P) One representative from Networks Northwest. (Q) One representative from the Michigan Municipal League. (R) One representative from the Michigan Townships Association. (S) One representative from the Michigan Downtown Association. (T) One representative from the Michigan Black Business Alliance. (U) One representative from the department of treasury. (iv) The following nonvoting members with expertise in housing or utilities services: (A) One representative from Michigan Future. (B) One representative from Consumers Energy. (C) One representative from DTE Energy. (D) One representative from Macomb County Planning and Economic Development. (E) One representative from Oakland County Economic Development. (F) One representative from Wayne County. (G) One representative from the Tribal Government Services and Policy. (H) One representative from Environmental Resource Group. (I) One representative from the Apartment Association of Michigan. (J) One representative from ICCF Community Homes. (K) One representative from the department of health and human services. (L) One representative from the Michigan state housing development authority created in section 21 of the state housing development authority act of 1966, 1966 PA 346, MCL 125.1421. (M) One representative from the Michigan Housing Council. (N) One representative from the Homebuilders Association of Michigan. (v) The following nonvoting members with expertise in education: (A) One individual who represents the Michigan Community College Association. (B) One individual who is an economics expert from Michigan State University. (C) One individual who is an economics expert from the University of Michigan. (D) One representative from the Michigan Education Association. (E) One representative from the Michigan Association for the Education of Young Children. (F) One representative from the Michigan Education Justice Coalition. (G) One representative from Michigan Education Technology Leaders. (H) One representative from the Michigan Education Research Institute. (I) One representative from the Michigan College Access Network. (J) One representative from the department of education. (K) One representative from the department of lifelong education, advancement, and potential. (L) One representative from the Michigan Association of School Boards. (M) One representative from the Michigan Association of State Universities. (N) One representative from Western Michigan University. (O) One representative from Wayne State University. (vi) The following nonvoting members with expertise in rural development: (A) One representative from Invest UP. (B) One representative from the Middle Michigan Development Corporation. (C) One representative from the Rural Partners of Michigan. (D) One representative from the Michigan Rural Community Assistance Program (RCAP). (E) One representative from the department of agriculture and rural development. (F) One representative from the Michigan Rural Development Council. (G) One representative from the department of labor and economic opportunity, office of rural prosperity. (vii) The following nonvoting members with expertise in innovation, technology, or manufacturing: (A) One representative from the Michigan Chamber of Commerce. (B) One representative from the Ann Arbor Spark. (C) One representative from Michigan Central. (D) One representative from Michigan State University Burgess Institute for Entrepreneurship and Innovation. (E) One representative from University of Michigan Center for Innovation. (F) One representative from ID Ventures. (G) One representative from Western Michigan University's Center for Bioscience Research and Commercialization. (H) One representative from the Michigan Manufacturers Association. (I) One representative from Michauto. (J) An innovation report policy representative of the Citizen's Research Council. (viii) The following nonvoting members with expertise in environmental matters: (A) One representative from the Michigan Environmental Justice Coalition. (B) One representative from the Clearwater Conservation Committee. (C) One representative from the Michigan League of Conservation Voters. (D) One representative from the Michigan Organic Farm and Food Alliance. (E) One representative from the UP Land Conservancy. (F) One representative from For the Love of Water (FLOW). (G) One representative from the department of environment, Great Lakes, and energy. (H) One representative from the department of natural resources. (I) One representative from the Michigan Environmental Council. (c) The following nonvoting members, appointed by the governor: (i) Two individuals who are experts on national economics. (ii) Two individuals who are top site-selection consultants. (iii) Two individuals who are each a leader of a national economic development organization focused on policy and practice. (3) The governor shall appoint the members of the strategic advisory board described under subsection (2)(b) within 90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that added this section. (4) The term of a member of the strategic advisory board is 1 year or until a successor is appointed under subsection (2), whichever is later, but not to exceed the time period it takes the strategic advisory board to develop the strategic plan in accordance with section 9c. (5) If a vacancy occurs on the strategic advisory board, the governor shall appoint an individual to fill the vacancy for the balance of the term. (6) The governor may remove a member of the strategic advisory board for incompetence, dereliction of duty, malfeasance, misfeasance, or nonfeasance in office, or any other good cause. (7) The individuals appointed under subsection (2)(b) shall call the first meeting of the strategic advisory board. At the first meeting, the nonvoting members appointed under subsection (2)(b) shall elect the voting members under subsection (2)(a) as follows: (a) The nonvoting members described in subsection (2)(b)(i) shall elect 4 of its own members listed under subsection (2)(b)(i) to serve as voting members under subsection (2)(a)(i). (b) The nonvoting members described in subsection (2)(b)(ii) shall elect 4 of its own members listed under subsection (2)(b)(ii) to serve as voting members under subsection (2)(a)(ii). (c) The nonvoting members described in subsection (2)(b)(iii) shall elect 4 of its own members listed under subsection (2)(b)(iii) to serve as voting members under subsection (2)(a)(iii). (d) The nonvoting members described in subsection (2)(b)(iv) shall elect 4 of its own members listed under subsection (2)(b)(iv) to serve as voting members under subsection (2)(a)(iv). (e) The nonvoting members described in subsection (2)(b)(v) shall elect 4 of its own members listed under subsection (2)(b)(v) to serve as voting members under subsection (2)(a)(v). (f) The nonvoting members described in subsection (2)(b)(vi) shall elect 4 of its own members listed under subsection (2)(b)(vi) to serve as voting members under subsection (2)(a)(vi). (g) The nonvoting members described in subsection (2)(b)(vii) shall elect 4 of its own members listed under subsection (2)(b)(vii) to serve as voting members under subsection (2)(a)(vii). (h) The nonvoting members described in subsection (2)(b)(viii) shall elect 4 of its own members listed under subsection (2)(b)(viii) to serve as voting members under subsection (2)(a)(viii). (8) After the voting members have been elected at the first meeting, the voting members of the strategic advisory board shall elect a member as a chairperson and may elect other officers that it considers necessary or appropriate. The governor may appoint 1 of the voting members to serve as a co-chair of the strategic advisory board. The strategic advisory board shall meet at least quarterly, or more frequently at the call of the chairperson or co-chair if appointed or at the request of 10 or more members. (9) A majority of the voting members of the strategic advisory board constitute a quorum for transacting business. A vote in favor by a majority of the voting members of the strategic advisory board serving is required for any action of the strategic advisory board. (10) The strategic advisory board shall conduct its business in compliance with the open meetings act, 1976 PA 267, MCL 15.261 to 15.275. (11) A writing that is prepared, owned, used, possessed, or retained by the strategic advisory board in performing an official function is subject to the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. (12) A member of the strategic advisory board is not entitled to compensation for service on the strategic advisory board, but the strategic advisory board may reimburse a member for actual and necessary expenses incurred in serving. (13) Only the voting members of the strategic advisory board shall develop a strategic plan in accordance with section 9c with advice and collaboration from the nonvoting members as described in this section. (14) In addition, the strategic advisory board may do either of the following: (a) Take any other action necessary to achieve the purposes of section 9c. (b) Perform any other duties or exercise any other powers assigned to the strategic advisory board by law. (15) Once the strategic advisory board develops and submits the strategic plan in accordance with section 9c, the strategic advisory board is dissolved and shall cease operations. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 213 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.